Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1471
Tenant, defined.

Tenant shall mean an owner of a mobile home who leases or rents space in a mobile home park, but shall not include a person who rents or leases a mobile home.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 22.